Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,117
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-15,117 to 81-15,127 shall be known and may be cited as the Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act.

Laws 1986, LB 217, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 31;

Laws 1991, LB 409, § 20;

Laws 1996, LB 1226, § 14;

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 39;

Laws 2001, LB 461, § 10.